Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-725
Commission; budget; submit.

The Commission on Judicial Qualifications shall submit its budget estimate in the manner and form and at the times required by law of all departments, offices, and institutions of the state government requesting appropriations.

Laws 1967, c. 141, § 11, p. 434.